Illinois, session 104th, HB1119.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 521B-30 and 21B-40 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)7    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.8    (a) (Blank).9    (a-5) In this Section:10    "Former or active first responder" means a person who 11either is currently serving or has formerly served as a law 12enforcement officer, a firefighter, or emergency medical 13services personnel as defined in Section 3.5 of the Emergency 14Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.15    "Military service member" means a person who is currently 16a member or who is a retired and honorably discharged member of 17the Armed Services of the United States, the Reserve Forces of 18the United States, or the Illinois National Guard. 19    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 20State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 21and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 22required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 23examinations and indicators must be based on national and   HB1119- 2 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 2State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 3Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 4Education may adopt such rules as may be necessary to 5implement and administer this Section.6    (c) (Blank).7    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 8paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 9applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a 10paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the 11endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 12requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 1321B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 14    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 15required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 16of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 17shall be no exception to this requirement. Subject to 18appropriation, a candidate who is either a former or active 19first responder or a military service member shall receive a 20refund for any costs associated with completing a test of 21content area knowledge under this subsection (d). 22    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 23vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 24of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 25of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 26elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to   HB1119- 3 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 2bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 3foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 4higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 5language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 6Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 7the language and literacy portion of the test on the 8recommended cut-score determined in the formal 9standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 10particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 11State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 12candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 13the number who pass the language and literacy portion.14    (e) (Blank).15    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 16Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 17completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 18candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 19to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 20provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 21August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 22beginning again on September 1, 2025, all candidates 23completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 24candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 25to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 26Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator   HB1119- 4 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1Preparation and Licensure Board. A candidate may not be 2required to submit test materials by video submission. Subject 3to appropriation, an individual who holds a Professional 4Educator License and is employed for a minimum of one school 5year by a school district designated as Tier 1 under Section 618-8.15 may, after application to the State Board, receive 7from the State Board a refund for any costs associated with 8completing the teacher performance assessment under this 9subsection. Subject to appropriation, a candidate who is 10either a former or active first responder or a military 11service member shall receive a refund for any costs associated 12with completing a teacher performance assessment under this 13subsection (f). 14    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 15created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 16teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 17across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 18the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 19supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 20Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 21ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 22shall consist of all of the following members:23        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 24    President of the Senate.25        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 26    Minority Leader of the Senate.  HB1119- 5 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 2    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.3        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 4    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 5    Representatives.6        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 7    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 8    Superintendent of Education.9        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 10    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 11    State Superintendent of Education.12        (7) One member from a statewide organization 13    representing school principals, appointed by the State 14    Superintendent of Education.15        (8) One member from a statewide organization 16    representing regional superintendents of schools, 17    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.18        (9) One member from a statewide organization 19    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 20    Superintendent of Education.21        (10) One member representing a school district 22    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 23    State Superintendent of Education.24        (11) One member of an association representing rural 25    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 26    of Education.  HB1119- 6 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1        (12) One member representing a suburban school 2    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 3    Education.4        (13) One member from a statewide organization 5    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 6    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 7    of Education.8        (14) One member from a statewide organization 9    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 10    State Superintendent of Education.11        (15) One member from a statewide organization 12    representing school districts in the collar counties of 13    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 14    of Education.15        (16) Three members, each representing a different 16    public university in this State and each a current member 17    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 18    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 19    Education.20        (17) Three members, each representing a different 21    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 22    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 23    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 24    Superintendent of Education.25        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 26    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.  HB1119- 7 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 2    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 3    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 4    Education.5        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 6    focused on research-based education policy to support a 7    school system that prepares all students for college, a 8    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 9    Superintendent of Education.10        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 11    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 12    Superintendent of Education.13        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 14    that partners with educator preparation programs and 15    school districts to support the growth and development of 16    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 17    of Education. 18        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 19    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 20    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 21    Education.22        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 23    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 24    Superintendent of Education.25        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 26    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State   HB1119- 8 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1    Superintendent of Education. 2    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 3compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 4the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 5meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 6who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 7Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 8administrative and other support to the Task Force.9    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 10on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 11performance assessment system in this State, to the State 12Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 13dissolved upon submission of this report. 14    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 15performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 16time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 17consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 18Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 19organization or tests designed by the State Board of 20Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 21and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 22assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 23tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 24person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 25of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 26the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The   HB1119- 9 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 2Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 3Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 4Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 5may include scoring and retaking of each test section 6separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 7not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 8designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 9with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 10    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 11the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 12applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 13subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 14Code in the English language and in the language of the 15transitional bilingual education program requested by the 16applicant. 17    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 18provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 19district subject to Article 34 of this Code.20    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 21testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 22limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 23validation, and determination of a passing score, 24administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 25applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 26years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special   HB1119- 10 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 2such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 3year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.4(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 5103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 68-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/21B-40)8    Sec. 21B-40. Fees.9    (a) Beginning with the start of the new licensure system 10established pursuant to this Article, the following fees shall 11be charged to applicants:12        (1) A $100 application fee for a Professional Educator 13    License or an Educator License with Stipulations.14        (1.5) A $50 application fee for a Substitute Teaching 15    License. If the application for a Substitute Teaching 16    License is made and granted after July 1, 2017, the 17    licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 18    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 19    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 20    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 21    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 22    Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full school days 23    within one year of issuance. 24        (1.7) A $25 application fee for a Short-Term 25    Substitute Teaching License. The Short-Term Substitute   HB1119- 11 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1    Teaching License must be registered in at least one region 2    in this State, but does not require a registration fee. 3    The licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 4    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 5    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 6    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 7    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 8    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full 9    school days within one year of issuance. The application 10    fee for a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License shall be 11    waived when the Governor has declared a disaster due to a 12    public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 13    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 14        (2) A $150 application fee for individuals who have 15    not been entitled by an Illinois-approved educator 16    preparation program at an Illinois institution of higher 17    education and are seeking any of the licenses set forth in 18    subdivision (1) of this subsection (a).19        (3) A $50 application fee for each endorsement or 20    approval.21        (4) A $10 per year registration fee for the course of 22    the validity cycle to register the license, which shall be 23    paid to the regional office of education having 24    supervision and control over the school in which the 25    individual holding the license is to be employed. If the 26    individual holding the license is not yet employed, then   HB1119- 12 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1    the license may be registered in any county in this State. 2    The registration fee must be paid in its entirety the 3    first time the individual registers the license for a 4    particular validity period in a single region. No 5    additional fee may be charged for that validity period 6    should the individual subsequently register the license in 7    additional regions. An individual must register the 8    license (i) immediately after initial issuance of the 9    license and (ii) at the beginning of each renewal cycle if 10    the individual has satisfied the renewal requirements 11    required under this Code.12        Beginning on July 1, 2017, at the beginning of each 13    renewal cycle, individuals who hold a Substitute Teaching 14    License may apply for a reimbursement of the registration 15    fee within 18 months of renewal and shall be issued that 16    reimbursement by the State Board of Education from funds 17    appropriated for that purpose if the licensee provides 18    evidence to the State Board of Education that the licensee 19    has taught pursuant to the Substitute Teaching License at 20    least 10 full school days within one year of renewal. 21        (5) The license renewal fee for an Educator License 22    with Stipulations with a paraprofessional educator 23    endorsement is $25. 24    (a-5) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, no 25former or active first responder or military service member, 26as defined in Section 21B-30 of this Code, may be charged an   HB1119- 13 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1application fee under subdivisions (1) through (3) of 2subsection (a) of this Section. 3    (b) All application fees paid pursuant to subdivisions (1) 4through (3) of subsection (a) of this Section shall be 5deposited into the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund and 6shall be used, subject to appropriation, by the State Board of 7Education to provide the technology and human resources 8necessary for the timely and efficient processing of 9applications and for the renewal of licenses. Funds available 10from the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund may also be 11used by the State Board of Education to support the 12recruitment and retention of educators, to support educator 13preparation programs as they seek national accreditation, and 14to provide professional development aligned with the 15requirements set forth in Section 21B-45 of this Code. A 16majority of the funds in the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving 17Fund must be dedicated to the timely and efficient processing 18of applications and for the renewal of licenses. The Teacher 19Certificate Fee Revolving Fund is not subject to 20administrative charge transfers, authorized under Section 8h 21of the State Finance Act, from the Teacher Certificate Fee 22Revolving Fund into any other fund of this State, and moneys in 23the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund shall not revert 24back to the General Revenue Fund at any time.25    The regional superintendent of schools shall deposit the 26registration fees paid pursuant to subdivision (4) of   HB1119- 14 -LRB104 04495 LNS 14522 b1subsection (a) of this Section into the institute fund 2established pursuant to Section 3-11 of this Code.3    (c) The State Board of Education and each regional office 4of education are authorized to charge a service or convenience 5fee for the use of credit cards for the payment of license 6fees. This service or convenience fee shall not exceed the 7amount required by the credit card processing company or 8vendor that has entered into a contract with the State Board or 9regional office of education for this purpose, and the fee 10must be paid to that company or vendor.11    (d) If, at the time a certificate issued under Article 21 12of this Code is exchanged for a license issued under this 13Article, a person has paid registration fees for any years of 14the validity period of the certificate and these years have 15not expired when the certificate is exchanged, then those fees 16must be applied to the registration of the new license.17(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-570, eff. 8-23-19; 18102-867, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202025.